Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1007.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Fairness in Access to Interventions for Reversal of Covered Alteration or Reassignment Encounters Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth."Gender transition intervention." A drug, device, surgery, procedure or counseling service that is intended to, or is reasonably expected to, alter physical, physiological, psychological or behavioral traits in order to present, appear 123456789101112131415161718 or identify as a sex different from the individual's biological sex."Health insurance policy." The term shall mean the same as defined under 40 Pa.C.S. § 4001 (relating to definitions)."Transition intervention reversal service." The following:(1) Health care services, including hormonal, surgical or behavioral health treatments, that are reasonably indicated for an individual who has previously undergone a gender transition intervention and who seeks to restore physical or functional characteristics consistent with the individual's biological sex.(2) The term includes:(i) counseling and mental health care related to reversal; and(ii) hormonal therapies, reconstructive procedures and behavioral health care.(3) The term does not include any procedure, treatment or counseling that constitutes or promotes a gender transition intervention.Section 3. Insurance coverage required.(a) Private insurance.--A health insurance policy delivered, issued for delivery or renewed within this Commonwealth shall provide coverage for medically necessary transition intervention reversal services if the health insurance policy previously covered a gender transition intervention for the same individual.(b) Medical assistance and Children's Health Insurance Program.--The department shall ensure that coverage for transition intervention reversal services is provided under all programs administered or funded by the Commonwealth, including 20250SB1007PN1170 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medical assistance and the Children's Health Insurance Program if the program previously covered a gender transition intervention for the same individual.(c) Compliance.--The Insurance Department shall ensure compliance with this section through review of insurance policy forms and any other appropriate regulatory oversight mechanisms.Section 4. Reporting.(a) Duty of insurers.--(1) A health insurer providing coverage in this Commonwealth shall annually report to the Insurance Department, in a manner and form prescribed by the Insurance Department, the number of individuals for whom transition intervention reversal services were covered, the general categories of services provided and the total expenditures.(2) Within 12 months of the effective date of this paragraph, and annually thereafter, the Insurance Department shall submit a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Banking and Insurance Committee of the Senate and the Insurance Committee of the House of Representatives summarizing implementation and utilization of coverage under private health insurance policies. The report shall include the number of covered individuals and claims submitted for transition intervention reversal services in aggregate form.(b) Duty of department.--Within 12 months of the effective date of this subsection, and annually thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives summarizing the number and type of transition 20250SB1007PN1170 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intervention reversal services covered under medical assistance and the Children's Health Insurance Program. The report shall include only aggregate data and may not contain individually identifiable health information.Section 5. Abrogation.All regulations or parts of regulations inconsistent with this act are abrogated.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1007PN1170 - 4 - 123456789